North Carolina, session 2025, HB1097.
General Assembly of North Carolina enacts:
SECTION 1. There is appropriated from the Information Technology Reserve
established in Section 2.2(h) of S.L. 2021-180 to the Department of Information Technology the
sum of ten million dollars ($10,000,000) in nonrecurring funds for the 2026-2027 fiscal year to
be used to develop an artificial intelligence assistant to improve navigation and accessibility of
information available on State agency websites. The Department shall prioritize assistance to
improve availability of information regarding, and improve connectivity between, the various
workforce development resource websites offered both by the State and by local governments.
In order to build familiarity and user recognition, the Department shall consider names for the
artificial intelligence assistant that are memorable and relatable to the State.
SECTION 2.(a) There is appropriated from the General Fund to the Department of
Commerce the sum of ten million dollars ($10,000,000) in nonrecurring funds for the 2026-2027
fiscal year for the Department to use to provide directed grants to local workforce development
boards for the design and implementation of innovative workforce programs designed to help
veterans attain new job skills necessary for reintegration into the job market. The Department
shall develop guidelines regarding (i) qualifications for local workforce development boards to
qualify for a directed grant and (ii) terms for grants and programs developed by those boards.
SECTION 2.(b) There is appropriated from the General Fund to the Department of
Commerce the sum of ten million dollars ($10,000,000) in nonrecurring funds for the 2026-2027
fiscal year for the Department to use to provide directed grants to local workforce development
boards for the design and implementation of innovative workforce programs designed to help
persons previously incarcerated attain new job skills necessary for reintegration into the job
market. The Department shall develop guidelines regarding (i) qualifications for local workforce
development boards to qualify for a directed grant and (ii) terms for grants and programs
developed by those boards.
SECTION 3. There is appropriated from the Information Technology Reserve
established in Section 2.2(h) of S.L. 2021-180 to the Department of Information Technology the
sum of one million five hundred thousand dollars ($1,500,000) in nonrecurring funds for the
*H1097-v-1*

General Assembly Of North Carolina Session 2025
2026-2027 fiscal year to be used to support professional development by promoting career
planning tools designed for working adults.
SECTION 4. This act becomes effective July 1, 2026.
Page 2 House Bill 1097-First Edition